Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.24, is amended to read: 171.24 VIOLATIONS; DRIVING WITHOUT VALID LICENSE. Subdivision 1. Driving after suspension; misdemeanor. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been suspended; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the suspension; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is suspended. Subd. 2. Driving after revocation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been revoked; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the revocation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is revoked. Subd. 3. Driving after cancellation; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled; (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled. Subd. 4. Driving after disqualification; misdemeanor. new text begin Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 5, new text end a person is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person: (1) has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver's license or been denied the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle; (2) has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the disqualification; and (3) disobeys the order by operating in this state a commercial motor vehicle while the person is disqualified to hold the license or privilege. Subd. 5. Gross misdemeanornew text begin violationsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: (1) the person's driver's license or driving privilege has been canceled or denied under section 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10); (2) the person has been given notice of or reasonably should know of the cancellation or denial; and (3) the person disobeys the order by operating in this state any motor vehicle, the operation of which requires a driver's license, while the person's license or privilege is canceled or denied. new text begin (b) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person commits a qualified violation and: new text end new text begin (1) the person causes a collision resulting in substantial bodily harm, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 7a, great bodily harm, as defined in section 609.02, subdivision 8, or death to another; or new text end new text begin (2) the violation is within ten years of the first of two prior convictions under this section. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "qualified violation" means a violation of this section when the suspension, revocation, cancellation, denial, or loss of driving privilege is pursuant to: new text end new text begin (1) section 169.89, subdivision 5; 169A.52; 169A.54; 171.05, subdivision 2b, paragraph (d); 171.13, subdivision 3 or 4; 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1) or (10); 171.177; 171.18, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (11); 171.32; or 260B.225, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (2) a violation of section 169.13; 169.21; 169.444; 609.19, subdivision 1, clause (2); or 609.487, subdivisions 3 to 5; new text end new text begin (3) any violation of chapter 169A; or new text end new text begin (4) a law from another state similar to those described in clauses (1) to (3). new text end Subd. 6. Responsibility for prosecution. new text begin (a) new text end The attorney in the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred who is responsible for prosecution of misdemeanor violations of this section is also responsible for prosecution of gross misdemeanor violations of this section. new text begin (b) Nothing in this section or section 609.035 or 609.04 limits the power of the state to prosecute or punish a person for conduct that constitutes any other crime under any other law of this state. new text end Subd. 7. Sufficiency of notice. (a) Notice of revocation, suspension, cancellation, or disqualification is sufficient if personally served, or if mailed by first class mail to the person's last known address or to the address listed on the person's driver's license. Notice is also sufficient if the person was informed that revocation, suspension, cancellation, or disqualification would be imposed upon a condition occurring or failing to occur, and where the condition has in fact occurred or failed to occur. (b) It is not a defense that a person failed to file a change of address with the post office, or failed to notify the department deleted text begin of Public Safetydeleted text end of a change of name or address as required under section 171.11. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date. new text end